Hawaii, session 2026, GM1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 291E-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e) The notice shall state that, if the respondent's
license and privilege to operate a vehicle is administratively
revoked after the review, a decision shall be mailed to the
respondent, or to the parent or guardian of the respondent if
the respondent is under the age of eighteen, that shall contain,
at a minimum, the following information:
(1) The reasons why the respondent's license and privilege
to operate a vehicle is administratively revoked;
(2) That the respondent may request the director, within
six days of the date the decision is mailed, to
schedule an administrative hearing to review the
administrative revocation;
(3) That, if the respondent's request for an
administrative hearing is received by the director
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
■iiiiiiiiiiiiHiimiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
within six days of the date the decision was mailed,
the hearing shall be scheduled to commence:
(A) No later than twenty-five days after the date of
the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation in the case of an alcohol related
offense; and
(B) No later than thirty-nine days after the date of
the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation in the case of a drug related offense;
(4) The procedure to request an administrative hearing;
(5) That failure to request an administrative hearing
within the time provided shall cause the
administrative revocation to take effect for the
period and under the conditions established by the
director in the decision;
(6) That the respondent may regain the right to a hearing
by requesting the director, within sixty days after
the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation, to schedule a hearing;
(7) That the director shall schedule the hearing to
commence no later than thirty days after a request
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
ininiiiniiiiiiiiiiniiiiii^

Page 3 H.B. NO. fg;
under paragraph (6) is received, but that, except as
provided in section [•2-94r&—291E-38 (k) , the
temporary permit shall not be extended if the
respondent fails to request an administrative hearing
within the initial six-day period provided for that
purpose;
(8) That failure to attend the hearing shall cause the
administrative revocation to take effect for the
period and under the conditions indicated;
(9) The duration of the administrative revocation and
other conditions that may be imposed, including:
referral to the driver's education program for an
assessment of the respondent's substance abuse or
dependence and the need for treatment; and
(10) That the respondent shall obtain an ignition interlock
permit in order to operate a vehicle during the
revocation period if the respondent had a valid
license at the time of the arrest."
SECTION 2. Section 291E-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx 3

Page 4 2097
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
"§291E-38 Administrative hearing; procedure; decision.
(a) If the director administratively revokes the respondent's
license and privilege to operate a vehicle after the
administrative review, the respondent may request an
administrative hearing to review the decision within six days of
the date the administrative review decision is mailed. If the
request for hearing is received by the director within six days
of the date the decision is mailed, the hearing shall be
scheduled to commence no later than:
(1) Twenty-five days from the date the notice of
administrative revocation was issued in a case
involving an alcohol related offense; or
(2) Thirty-nine days from the date the notice of
administrative revocation was issued in a case
involving a drug related offense.
The director may continue the hearing only as provided in
subsection (k) .
(b) The hearing shall be held at a place designated by the
director, as close to the location where the notice of
administrative revocation was issued as practical.
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx

Page 5
H.B. NO.
(c) The hearing may be held by interactive conference
technology that allows interaction by the director^ any party,
and counsel, if retained by the party. An administrative
hearing held by interactive conference technology shall be
recessed for up to one hour when audio communication cannot be
maintained; provided that the hearing may reconvene only when
audio communication is reestablished. If audio-only
communication is reestablished, then each speaker shall state
the speaker's name before making remarks.
For the purposes of this subsection, "interactive
conference technology" means any form of audio or audio and
visual conference technology, including teleconference,
videoconference, and voice over internet protocol, that may be
used to facilitate interaction between the director, any party,
and counsel, if retained by the party, in a hearing conducted
under this section.
[-<eM (d) The respondent may be represented by counsel
and, if the respondent is under the age of eighteen, [must]
shall be accompanied by a parent or guardian.
[-{-44-] (e) The director shall conduct the hearing and have
authority to:
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
MiiiiHiiiniiiiHnniii

Page 6 2097
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
(1) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(2) Examine witnesses and take testimony;
(3) Receive and determine the relevance of evidence;
provided that if the hearing is held by interactive
conference technology, as provided in subsection (c),
evidence may be submitted and exchanged by electronic
means;
(4) Issue subpoenas;
(5) Regulate the course and conduct of the hearing; and
(6) Make a final ruling.
(f) The director shall affirm the administrative
revocation only if the director determines that:
(1) There existed reasonable suspicion to stop the
vehicle, the vehicle was stopped at an intoxicant
control roadblock established and operated in
compliance with sections 291E-19 and 291E-20, or the
person was tested pursuant to section 291E-21;
(2) There existed probable cause to believe that the
respondent operated the vehicle while under the
influence of an intoxicant; and
(3) The evidence proves by a preponderance that:
2026-1794.HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
liiiiiiiMiiinmnii

Page 7 2097
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
(A) The respondent operated the vehicle while under
the influence of an intoxicant; or
(B) The respondent operated the vehicle and refused
to submit to a breath, blood, or urine test after
being informed:
(i) That the person may refuse to submit to
testing in compliance with section 291E-11;
and
(ii) Of the sanctions of this part and then asked
if the person still refuses to submit to a
breath, blood, or urine test in compliance
with the requirements of section 291E-15.
[-{^] (g) The respondent's prior alcohol and drug
enforcement contacts shall be entered into evidence.
[4-g^] 12^ The sworn statements provided in section 291E-36
shall be admitted into evidence. The director shall consider
the sworn statements in the absence of the law enforcement
officer or other person. Upon written notice to the director,
no later than five days [prior to] before the hearing, that the
respondent wishes to examine a law enforcement officer or other
person who made a sworn statement, the director shall issue a
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
Miiiiiniinmiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
subpoena for the officer or other person to appear at the
hearing. Personal service upon the law enforcement officer or
other person who made a sworn statement shall be made no later
than forty-eight hours [prior to] before the hearing time. If
the officer or other person cannot appear, the officer or other
person at the discretion of the director, may testify by
telephone.
(i) The hearing shall be recorded in a manner to be
determined by the director.
[-(-id-] (j) The director's decision shall be rendered in
writing and mailed to the respondent, or to the parent or
guardian of the respondent if the respondent is under the age of
eighteen, no later than five days after the hearing is
concluded. If the decision is to reverse the administrative
revocation, the director shall return the respondent's license,
along with a certified statement that administrative revocation
proceedings have been terminated. If the decision sustains the
administrative revocation, the director shall mail to the
respondent a written decision indicating the duration of the
administrative revocation and any other conditions or
restrictions as may be imposed pursuant to section 291E-41.
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx 8
iiiiiiwiiiiiiiiiinH

Page 9 2097
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
[-t^] (k) For good cause shown, the director may grant a
continuance either of the commencement of the hearing or of a
hearing that has already commenced. If a continuance is granted
at the request of the director, the director shall extend the
validity of the temporary permit, unless otherwise prohibited,
for a period not to exceed the period of the continuance. If a
continuance is granted at the request of the respondent, the
director shall not extend the validity of the temporary permit.
For purposes of this section, a continuance means a delay in the
commencement of the hearing or an interruption of a hearing that
has commenced, other than for recesses during the day or at the
end of the day or week. The absence from the hearing of a law
enforcement officer or other person, upon whom personal service
of a subpoena has been made as set forth in subsection [-fg-H-]
(h), constitutes good cause for a continuance.
[-He)-] (1) The director may grant a special motor vehicle
registration, pursuant to section 291E-48, to a qualified
household member or a co-owner of any motor vehicle upon
determination that:
(1) The person is completely dependent on the motor
vehicle for the necessities of life; and
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx
HllinilMIIIIIBIinillHIHIH

Page 10
H.B. NO.
(2) At the time of the application for a special motor
vehicle registration, the respondent does not have a
valid ignition interlock permit.
The special motor vehicle registration shall not be valid for
use by the respondent.
(m) If the respondent fails to appear at the
hearing, or if a respondent under the age of eighteen fails to
appear with a parent or guardian, administrative revocation
shall take effect for the period and under the conditions
established by the director in the administrative review
decision issued by the director under section 291E-37."
SECTION 3. Section 291E-46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§291E-46 Computation of time. The time in which any act
provided in this part is to be done is computed by excluding the
first day and including the last, unless the last day is a
Saturday, Sunday, or state holiday, and then it also is
excluded; provided that if the last day for the mailing of
decisions under sections 291E-37{a) and [391E-38(i)] 291E-38(j)
is a federal holiday, it also is excluded."
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx 10

Page 11 2097
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
SECTION 4. Section 291E-48, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Anytime after the effective date of revocation or
after the administrative hearing decision is mailed pursuant to
section 38 (i) , ] 291E-38 (j ) , a qualified household member
or co-owner of a motor vehicle with a respondent who has had a
motor vehicle registration revoked under this part may submit a
sworn statement to the director requesting a special motor
vehicle registration. The director may grant the request upon
determining that the following conditions have been met:
(1) The applicant is a household member of the
respondent's or a co-owner of the vehicle;
(2) The applicant has a license that has not expired or
been suspended or revoked;
(3) The applicant is completely dependent on the motor
vehicle for the necessities of life;
(4) The director finds that the applicant will take
reasonable precautions to ensure that the respondent
will not drive the vehicle; and
(5) The respondent does not have a valid ignition
interlock permit.
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx 11

Page 12 H.B. NO.
2^1
A person to whom a special motor vehicle registration has been
granted shall apply to the director of the appropriate county
agency for special series number plates, as provided in section
249-9.4."
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-1794 HB2097 SDl SMA.docx 12

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 19th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2097, HD 1, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 2097, H.D. 1, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3790